Arkansas, session 2025, HB1142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Reproductive
Empowerment and Support Through Optimal Restoration (RESTORE) Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 26 — Reproductive Empowerment and Support Through Optimal
Restoration Act

20-16-2601. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Reproductive
Empowerment and Support Through Optimal Restoration Act".

20-16-2602. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) There is a growing interest among women to proactively
*JMB059*
03-19-2025 15:36:33 JMB059

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1142
assess their overall health and understand how factors such as age and
medical history contribute to reproductive health and fertility;
(2)(A) Women are worthy of the highest standard of medical care,
including the opportunity to assess, understand, and improve their
reproductive health.
(B) Unfortunately, many women do not receive adequate
information about their reproductive health and do not have access to
restorative reproductive medicine;
(3) Reproductive health conditions are the leading causes of
infertility, which affects fifteen to sixteen percent (15-16%) of couples in
the United States;
(4) Research shows four (4) or more conditions or factors are
the cause of most female infertility;
(5) There is a gap in research and care for female reproductive
health conditions, which affects many Americans struggling with unexplained
infertility;
(6) Restorative reproductive medicine aims to diagnose and treat
underlying hormonal and other imbalances, restore health when possible, and
improve women’s health functioning and long-term outcomes;
(7) Restorative reproductive medicine can eliminate barriers to
successful conception, pregnancy, and birth as well as address some causes of
recurrent miscarriages; and
(8) Restorative reproductive medicine often alleviates some
difficult symptoms associated with reproductive health conditions, including
hormonal acne, hormonal weight gain, hormonal mood changes and depression,
painful menstruation, painful flare-ups, bloating, inflammation, heavy
menstruation, irregular menstruation, nerve pain, bowel symptoms, pain during
sexual intercourse, and back pain.

20-16-2603. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Assisted reproductive technology" means a treatment or
procedure involving the handling of a human egg, sperm, or embryo outside of
the body with the intent of facilitating a pregnancy, including:
(A) Artificial insemination;
(B) Intrauterine insemination;
03-19-2025 15:36:33 JMB059

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1142
(C) In vitro fertilization;
(D) Gamete intrafallopian fertilization;
(E) Zygote intrafallopian fertilization;
(F) Egg, embryo, or sperm cryopreservation; and
(G) Egg, sperm, or embryo donation;
(2)(A) "Fertility awareness-based methods" means modern,
evidence-based methods of tracking the menstrual cycle through observable
biological signs in a woman, such as body temperature, cervical fluid, or
hormone production in the reproductive system, including luteinizing hormone
and estrogen.
(B) "Fertility awareness-based methods" includes without
limitation:
(i) Fertility education and medical management;
(ii) The symptothermal method;
(iii) The Creighton Model FertilityCare System; and
(iv) The Billings Ovulation Method;
(3) "Fertility education and medical management" means the
program developed in collaboration with the Reproductive Health Research
Institute for medical research, protocols, and medical training for
healthcare professionals in order to enable the clinical application of
research advances in reproductive endocrinology, by providing education for
women about their bodies and hormonal health and medical support, as
appropriate;
(4) "Infertility" means a symptom of an underlying disease or
condition within a person’s body that makes successfully conceiving and
carrying a child to term difficult or impossible, which is diagnosed after:
(A) Twelve (12) months of sexual intercourse without the
use of a chemical, barrier, or other contraceptive method for women under
thirty-five (35) years of age; or
(B) Six (6) months of targeted sexual intercourse without
the use of a chemical, barrier, or other contraceptive method for women who
are thirty-five (35) years of age and older, when conception should otherwise
be possible;
(5) "Natural procreative technology" means an approach to health
care that monitors and maintains a woman's reproductive and gynecological
health, including laparoscopic gynecologic surgery to reconstruct the uterus,
03-19-2025 15:36:33 JMB059

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1142
fallopian tubes, ovaries, or other organ structures to eliminate
endometriosis and other reproductive health conditions;
(6) "Reproductive health condition" means a health condition
that makes successfully conceiving a child difficult to impossible when
conception should otherwise be possible, including without limitation:
(A) Endometriosis;
(B) Adenomyosis;
(C) Polycystic ovary syndrome;
(D) Uterine fibroids;
(E) Blocked fallopian tubes;
(F) Hormonal imbalances;
(G) Hyperprolactinemia;
(H) Thyroid conditions; and
(I) Ovulation dysfunctions;
(7) "Restorative reproductive health" means a scientific
approach to reproductive medicine that seeks to cooperate with or restore the
normal physiology and anatomy of the human reproductive system, including
without limitation:
(A) Body literacy programs that incorporate science-based
charting methods;
(B) Teacher-led reproductive health education;
(C) Restorative reproductive medicine;
(D) Natural procreative technology;
(E) Fertility awareness-based methods; and
(F) Fertility education and medical management; and
(8)(A) "Restorative reproductive medicine" means a scientific
approach to reproductive medicine that seeks to cooperate with or restore the
normal physiology and anatomy of the human reproductive system without the
use of methods that are inherently suppressive, circumventive, or destructive
to natural human functions.
(B) "Restorative reproductive medicine" includes:
(i) Ultrasounds;
(ii) Blood tests;
(iii) Hormone panels;
(iv) Laparoscopic and exploratory surgeries;
(v) Examinations of a patient's overall health and
03-19-2025 15:36:33 JMB059

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1142
lifestyle;
(vi) Elimination of environmental endocrine disruptors;
(vii) Assessment of the health and fertility of a
patient's partner;
(viii) Natural procreative technology;
(ix) Fertility awareness-based methods; and
(x) Fertility education and medical management.

20-16-2604. Assisted reproductive technology — Discrimination against
nonparticipating healthcare providers prohibited.
Notwithstanding any other state law, a person or entity that receives
state financial assistance or local government assistance shall not penalize,
retaliate against, or otherwise discriminate against a healthcare provider on
the basis that the healthcare provider does not or declines to:
(1) Assist in, receive training in, provide, perform, refer for,
pay for, or otherwise participate in assisted reproductive technology; or
(2) Facilitate or make arrangements for any of the activities
under subdivision (1) of this section in a manner that violates the
healthcare provider's sincerely held religious beliefs or moral convictions.

20-16-2605. Fertility awareness-based methods — Incorporation into
Title X programs.
(a) All Title X-funded facilities in Arkansas shall include fertility
awareness-based methods as part of covered family planning and reproductive
health services.
(b)(1) The Department of Health shall work with Title X-funded
facilities to integrate fertility awareness-based methods into existing
programs within twelve (12) months of the effective date of this section.
(2) The department shall provide guidance and support to
facilities in implementing the fertility awareness-based methods, including:
(A) Training for healthcare providers on fertility
awareness-based methods; and
(B) Development of patient education materials on
fertility awareness-based methods.
(c) Title X-funded facilities shall allocate a portion of existing
Title X funds to cover implementing and providing fertility awareness-based
03-19-2025 15:36:33 JMB059

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1142
methods.

20-16-2606. Advancing education on reproductive health conditions.
(a) As authorized by state or federal funding, the Department of Health
shall integrate information about fertility awareness-based methods into
existing public health programs, including:
(1) Family planning services;
(2) Maternal and child health programs; and
(3) Women's health initiatives.
(b) Existing health education materials and resources shall be updated
to include information on restorative reproductive medicine.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-85-137 is amended to read as follows:
23-85-137. In vitro fertilization coverage required — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1)(A) "Fertility awareness-based methods" means modern,
evidence-based methods of tracking the menstrual cycle of a woman through
observable biological signs, including without limitation:
(i) Body temperature;
(ii) Cervical fluid; or
(iii) Hormone production in the reproductive system,
including luteinizing hormone and estrogen.
(B) "Fertility awareness-based methods" includes without
limitation:
(i) Fertility education and medical management;
(ii) The symptothermal method;
(iii) The Creighton Model FertilityCare System; or
(iv) Billings Ovulation Method;
(2) "Fertility education and medical management" means a program
developed in collaboration with the Reproductive Health Research Institute
for medical research, protocols, and medical training for healthcare
professionals in order to enable the clinical application of research
advances in reproductive endocrinology by providing education for a woman
about her body and hormonal health and medical support, as appropriate;
(3) "Natural procreative technology" means an approach to
healthcare services that monitors and maintains a woman's reproductive and
03-19-2025 15:36:33 JMB059

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1142
gynecological health, including without limitation laparoscopic gynecologic
surgery to reconstruct the uterus, fallopian tubes, ovaries, and other organ
structures, to eliminate endometriosis and other reproductive health
conditions; and
(4)(A) "Restorative reproductive medicine" means any scientific
approach to reproductive medicine that seeks to cooperate with or restore the
normal physiology and anatomy of the human reproductive system without the
use of methods that are suppressive, circumventive, or destructive to natural
human functions.
(B) "Restorative reproductive medicine" includes without
limitation:
(i) An ultrasound;
(ii) A blood test;
(iii) A hormone panel test;
(iv) A Laparoscopic or exploratory surgery;
(v) An examination of a patient's overall health and
lifestyle;
(vi) Eliminating environmental endocrine disruptors;
(vii) Assessing the health and fertility of a
patient's partner;
(viii) Natural procreative technology;
(ix) Fertility awareness-based methods; or
(x) Fertility education and medical management.
(b) All An accident and health insurance companies company doing
business in this state shall include, as a covered expense, in vitro
fertilization and restorative reproductive medicine.
(b)(c) Pursuant to the applicable provisions of Under the Arkansas
Insurance Code, the Insurance Commissioner may suspend or revoke the
certificate of authority of any insurance company failing to comply with the
provisions of this section.
(c)(d) After conducting appropriate studies and public hearings, the
commissioner shall establish minimum and maximum levels of coverage to be
provided by the an accident and health insurance companies company.
(d)(e) Coverage required under this section shall include services and
procedures performed at a medical facility licensed or certified by the
Department of Health or another state health department that conform to the
03-19-2025 15:36:33 JMB059

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1142
guidelines and minimum standards of the:
(1) American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists for in
vitro fertilization clinics; or
(2) American Society for Reproductive Medicine for programs of
in vitro fertilization; or
(3) Institute of Restorative Reproductive Medicine of America
for programs of restorative reproductive medicine.
(e)(f) Continued certification shall require that the facility is
achieving a reasonable success rate with both fertilization, fertility, and
births.
(f)(g) Appropriate laboratory facilities must shall be provided by the
entity requesting certification.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-86-118 is amended to read as follows:
23-86-118. In vitro fertilization coverage required — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1)(A) "Fertility awareness-based methods" means modern,
evidence-based methods of tracking the menstrual cycle of a woman through
observable biological signs, including without limitation:
(i) Body temperature;
(ii) Cervical fluid; or
(iii) Hormone production in the reproductive system,
including luteinizing hormone and estrogen.
(B) "Fertility awareness-based methods" includes without
limitation:
(i) Fertility education and medical management;
(ii) The symptothermal method;
(iii) The Creighton Model FertilityCare System; or
(iv) The Billings Ovulation Method;
(2) "Fertility education and medical management" means a program
developed in collaboration with the Reproductive Health Research Institute
for medical research, protocols, and medical training for healthcare
professionals in order to enable the clinical application of research
advances in reproductive endocrinology by providing education for a woman
about her body and hormonal health and medical support, as appropriate;
(3) "Natural procreative technology" means an approach to
03-19-2025 15:36:33 JMB059

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1142
healthcare services that monitors and maintains a woman's reproductive and
gynecological health, including without limitation laparoscopic gynecologic
surgery to reconstruct the uterus, fallopian tubes, ovaries, and other organ
structures, to eliminate endometriosis and other reproductive health
conditions; and
(4)(A) "Restorative reproductive medicine" means any scientific
approach to reproductive medicine that seeks to cooperate with or restore the
normal physiology and anatomy of the human reproductive system without the
use of methods that are suppressive, circumventive, or destructive to natural
human functions.
(B) "Restorative reproductive medicine" includes without
limitation:
(i) An ultrasound;
(ii) A blood test;
(iii) A hormone panel test;
(iv) A Laparoscopic or exploratory surgery;
(v) An examination of a patient's overall health and
lifestyle;
(vi) Eliminating environmental endocrine disruptors;
(vii) Assessing the health and fertility of a
patient's partner;
(viii) Natural procreative technology;
(ix) Fertility awareness-based methods; or
(x) Fertility education and medical management.
(b) All An accident and health insurance companies company doing
business in this state shall include, as a covered expense, in vitro
fertilization and restorative reproductive medicine.
(b)(c) Pursuant to the applicable provisions of Under the Arkansas
Insurance Code, the Insurance Commissioner may suspend or revoke the
certificate of authority of any insurance company failing to comply with the
provisions of this section.
(c)(d) After conducting appropriate studies and public hearings, the
commissioner shall establish minimum and maximum levels of coverage to be
provided by the an accident and health insurance companies company.
(d)(e) Coverage required under this section shall include services
performed at:
03-19-2025 15:36:33 JMB059

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1142
(1) a A medical facility licensed or certified by the Department
of Health,;
(2) those performed at a A facility certified by the department
that conforms to the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists
guidelines for in vitro fertilization clinics, or;
(3) those performed at a A facility certified by the department
that meets the American Society for Reproductive Medicine minimal standards
for programs of in vitro fertilization; or
(4) A facility certified by the department that meets the
guidelines and standards of the Institute of Restorative Reproductive
Medicine of America for programs of restorative reproductive medicine.

/s/A. Brown























03-19-2025 15:36:33 JMB059